District of Columbia statutes.
15-104

Priority of liens.

The lien of a mortgage or deed of trust upon real property, given by the purchaser to secure the payment of the whole or any part of the purchase-money, is superior to that of a previous judgment or decree against the purchaser.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 523, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
1981 Ed., § 15-104.
1973 Ed., § 15-104.